test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaaddask_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kaaddâšǩ e-stem likasanko: # Noun - full paradigm
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kadška
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kadšǩest
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kadšǩin
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Ess+Indef: kadšǩen
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Par+Indef: kadšǩed
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kaaddâšǩtaa, kaaddâšǩtää]
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kaaddâšǩ
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kadšǩi
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kadšǩid
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kadšǩid
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kadšǩin
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kadšǩivuiʹm
     kaaddâšǩ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kadšǩitaa, kadšǩitää]
